District of Columbia statutes.
28:2-710

Seller’s incidental damages.

Incidental damages to an aggrieved seller include any commercially reasonable charges, expenses or commissions incurred in stopping delivery, in the transportation, care and custody of goods after the buyer’s breach, in connection with return or resale of the goods or otherwise resulting from the breach.

History

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 667, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28:2-706, § 28:2-707, and § 28:2-708.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:2-710.
1973 Ed., § 28:2-710.

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Prior Uniform Statutory Provision: See Sections 64 and 70, Uniform Sales Act.

Purposes: To authorize reimbursement of the seller for expenses reasonably incurred by him as a result of the buyer’s breach. The section sets forth the principal normal and necessary additional elements of damage flowing from the breach but intends to allow all commercially reasonable expenditures made by the seller.

Definitional Cross References: “Aggrieved party”. Section 1-201.

“Buyer”. Section 2-103.

“Goods”. Section 2-105.

“Seller”. Section 2-103.